Idaho statutes. Title 6 ACTIONS IN PARTICULAR CASES
Chapter 15
LIABILITY TO FIREWOOD GATHERERS

Section.

§ 6-1501. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Firewood gatherer” means a person who enters onto forest land with or without the consent of the owner of the forest land or by payment of a fee in order to gather or cut wood for use as firewood.

“Forest land” means any privately owned land being held and used for the continuous purpose of growing and harvesting trees of a marketable species.

§ 6-1502. Owners of forest land exempt from liability — Exception.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an owner of forest land shall not be liable to a firewood gatherer for damages or injuries to the firewood gatherer arising from the condition of the forest land or the forest products attached to or upon the forest land unless the damage or injury is caused by the gross negligence, recklessness or intentional misconduct of the owner of the forest land.